Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2027.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5732XS (2) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2027 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ DOUBLE 1 UP FOOD BUCKS PROGRAM ââ SUPPLEMENTAL APPROPRIATION. There 2 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 3 department of health and human services for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, in addition 5 to any other funding appropriated for such purpose for the same 6 fiscal year, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 7 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,000,000 9 The appropriation made in this section shall be used to 10 provide a grant to the Iowa healthiest state initiative to 11 support the double up food bucks program to make fresh fruits 12 and vegetables sold at farmers markets, grocery stores, and 13 other participating locations accessible to individuals and 14 families who reside in this state and receive assistance 15 through the federal supplemental nutrition assistance program. 16